Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 67.28.1816 and 2013 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Lodging tax revenues under this chapter may be used, directly by any municipality or indirectly through a convention and visitors bureau or destination marketing organization for:(a) Tourism marketing;(b) The marketing and operations of special events and festivals designed to attract tourists;(c) Supporting the operations and capital expenditures of tourism-related facilities owned or operated by a municipality or a public facilities district created under chapters 35.57 and 36.100 RCW; or(d) Supporting the operations and capital expenditures of tourism-related facilities owned or operated by nonprofit organizations described under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) and 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(6) of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended.(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, applicants applying for use of revenues in this chapter must provide the municipality to which they are applying estimates of how any moneys received will result in increases in the number of people traveling for business or pleasure on a trip:(i) Away from their place of residence or business and staying overnight in paid accommodations;(ii) To a place ((fifty))50 miles or more one way from their place of residence or business for the day or staying overnight; or(iii) From another country or state outside of their place of residence or their business.(b)(i) In a municipality with a population of ((five thousand))5,000 or more, applicants applying for use of revenues in this chapter must submit their applications and estimates described under (a) of this subsection to the local lodging tax advisory committee.(ii) The local lodging tax advisory committee must select the candidates from amongst the applicants applying for use of revenues in this chapter and provide a list of such candidates and recommended amounts of funding to the municipality for final determination. The municipality may choose only recipients from the list of candidates and recommended amounts provided by the local lodging tax advisory committee.(c)(i) All recipients must submit a report to the municipality describing the actual number of people traveling for business or pleasure on a trip:(A) Away from their place of residence or business and staying overnight in paid accommodations;(B) To a place ((fifty))50 miles or more one way from their place of residence or business for the day or staying overnight; or(C) From another country or state outside of their place of residence or their business. A municipality receiving a report must: Make such report available to the local legislative body and the public; and furnish copies of the report to the joint legislative audit and review committee and members of the local lodging tax advisory committee.(ii) The joint legislative audit and review committee must on a biennial basis report to the economic development committees of the legislature on the use of lodging tax revenues by municipalities. Reporting under this subsection must begin in calendar year 2015.(d) This section does not apply to the revenues of any lodging tax authorized under this chapter imposed by a county with a population of ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 or more.--- END ---